pt-BR: Tipo de terminal do plug do Spark: Porca de terminal removível; Terminal SAE; Terminal sólido; Pino roscado; Outros
es: Tipo de terminal de la bujía: Tuerca de terminal extraíble; Terminal SAE; Terminal sólida; Perno roscado; Otro
sl-SI: Vrsta priključka vžigalne svečke: Odstranljiva matica priključka; Priključek SAE; Kompaktni priključek; Navojni priključek; Drugo
zh-CN: 火花塞端子类型: 可拆卸接线螺母; SAE 接线端子; 实心接线端子; 螺纹接线柱; 其他
bg-BG: Тип клема на запалителна свещ: Сваляща се терминална гайка; SAE терминал; Твърд терминал; Шпилка с резба; Друго
ro-RO: Tip de terminal al bujiei: Piuliță de terminal detașabilă; Terminal SAE; Terminal solid; Știft filetat; Altele
sk-SK: Typ svorky zapaľovacej sviečky: Odnímateľná matica koncovky; Koncovka SAE; Pevná koncovka; Závitový kolík; Iná
th: ประเภทขั้วหัวเทียน: น็อตขั้วแบบถอดได้; ขั้ว SAE; ขั้วแบบติดตาย; ขั้วเกลียว; อื่นๆ
ru: Тип клеммы свечи зажигания: Съемная контактная гайка; Клемма SAE; Цельная клемма; Резьбовой штырь; Другое
hu: Gyújtógyertya csatlakozó típusa: Levehető csatlakozóanya; SAE csatlakozó; Tömör csatlakozó; Menetes szár; Egyéb
el: Τύπος ακροδέκτη αναφλεκτήρα: Αφαιρούμενο παξιμάδι ακροδέκτη; Ακροδέκτης SAE; Συμπαγής ακροδέκτης; Ακροδέκτης με σπείρωμα; Άλλο
pt-PT: Tipo de terminal da vela de ignição: Porca de terminal amovível; Terminal SAE; Terminal sólido; Perno roscado; Outro
da: Terminaltype på tændrør: Aftagelig terminalmøtrik; SAE-terminal; Massiv terminal; Gevindtap; Andet
ja: スパークプラグ端末タイプ: 取り外し可能なターミナルナット; SAE ターミナル; 一体型ターミナル; ネジ型ターミナル; その他
vi: Loại đầu nối bugi: Đai ốc cực tháo rời được; Cực SAE; Cực đặc; Đinh tán ren; Khác
cs: Typ koncovky zapalovací svíčky: Odnímatelná matice terminálu; Terminál SAE; Pevný terminál; Závitový čep; Jiné
fr: Type de borne de bougie: Écrou terminal amovible; Borne SAE; Borne solide; Goujon fileté; Autre
zh-TW: 火星塞端子類型: 可拆式端子螺帽; SAE 端子; 實心端子; 螺柱; 其他
ko: 점화 플러그 단자 유형: 탈착식 단자 너트; SAE 단자; 솔리드 단자; 스레드 스터드; 기타
pl: Typ końcówki świecy zapłonowej: Odkręcana nakrętka terminala; Złącze SAE; Złącze stałe; Gwintowany trzpień; Inne
it: Tipo di terminale della candela Spark: Dado del terminale rimovibile; Terminale SAE; Terminale solido; Perno filettato; Altro
lt-LT: Uždegimo žvakės terminalo tipas: Nuimama kontaktinė veržlė; SAE kontaktas; Vientisas kontaktas; Srieginis kaištis; Kita
en: Spark plug terminal type: Removable terminal nut; SAE terminal; Solid terminal; Threaded stud; Other
hr-HR: Vrsta terminala svjećice: Uklonjiva matica priključka; SAE terminal; Fiksni terminal; Navojni svornjak; Ostalo
sv: Typ av terminal för tändstift: Avtagbar anslutningsmutter; SAE-anslutning; Fast anslutning; Gängad tapp; Annat
tr: Buji terminal tipi: Çıkarılabilir terminal somunu; SAE terminali; Sabit terminal; Dişli saplama; Diğer
fi: Sytytystulpan liitintyyppi: Irrotettava liitinmutteri; SAE-liitin; Kiinteä liitin; Kierteinen tappi; Muu
de: Art des Zündkerzensteckers: Abnehmbare Anschlussmutter; SAE-Anschluss; Fester Anschluss; Gewindeanschluss; Sonstige
nl: Type bougieaansluiting: Verwijderbare aansluitmoer; SAE-aansluiting; Vaste aansluiting; Schroefdraad; Overige
nb: Terminaltype for tennplugg: Avtakbar terminalmutter; SAE-terminal; Solid terminal; Gjenget tapp; Annet